Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3281.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Audiologist” means a person licensed to practice audiology under this chapter.

“Audiology” means the application of principles, methods, and procedures related to hearing and the disorders of hearing, and to related language and speech disorders, which includes all conditions that impede the normal process of human communication, including disorders of auditory sensitivity, acuity, function, or processing.

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Disciplinary action” includes any action taken by an administrative law officer established by

3 V.S.A. § 129(j)

against a licensed audiologist or hearing aid dispenser or an applicant premised on a finding that the licensee or applicant has engaged in unprofessional conduct. “Disciplinary action” includes all appropriate remedies, including obtaining injunctions, refusing to grant or renew a license, suspending or revoking a license, or issuing warnings.

“Hearing aid” means an amplifying device to be worn by a person who is hard of hearing to improve hearing, including any accessories specifically used in connection with such a device, but excluding theater- or auditorium-wide-area listening devices, telephone amplifiers, or other devices designed to replace a hearing aid for restricted situations.

“Hearing aid dispenser” means a person licensed under this chapter to dispense hearing aids.

“Practice of audiology” includes the following services, which may be provided to persons of all ages:

facilitating the conservation of auditory system function, and developing and implementing environmental and occupational hearing conservation programs;

screening, identifying, assessing, and interpreting, diagnosing, preventing, and rehabilitating peripheral and central auditory system dysfunctions;

providing and interpreting behavioral and electro-physiological measurements of auditory, vestibular, and facial nerve functions;

selecting, fitting, and dispensing of hearing aids, amplification, assistive listening and alerting devices, implantable devices, and other systems, and providing training in their use;

dispensing hearing aids, including conducting and interpreting hearing tests for the purpose of selecting suitable hearing aids;

making ear molds or impressions;

providing instruction to patients on the care and use of hearing aids, auditory system functions, and hearing conservation;

all acts pertaining to selling, renting, leasing, pricing, delivering, and giving warranties for hearing aids;

providing aural rehabilitation and related counseling services to individuals who are hard of hearing and their families;

screening of speech-language and other factors affecting communication function for the purposes of an audiologic evaluation, or initial identification of individuals with other communication disorders; and

management of cerumen.

“Practice of dispensing hearing aids” includes the following services, which may only be provided to persons 18 years of age or older:

the measurement of the sensitivity of human hearing by means of appropriate behavioral testing for the sole purpose of fitting air-conduction hearing aids;

the otoscopic observation of the outer ear in connection with the measurement of hearing and the fitting of hearing aids and for the purpose of referral to other professionals;

the production of ear impressions for earmolds for the purpose of selecting and fitting hearing aids;

the analysis of hearing aid function by means of the appropriate testing equipment;

the selection and fitting of hearing aids with appropriate instruction, orientation, counseling, and management regarding the use and maintenance of these devices and other accessories; and

the modification and general servicing of hearing aids.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), (d);

1997, No. 40

, § 49(a);

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 178;

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3282.
Records and equipment.

A licensee shall maintain records relating to the sale of his or her goods and services and, upon request, shall make such records available to the Director for review. A licensee shall maintain records required to be kept under this section for a period of at least seven years from the date of the sale.

A licensee shall make the testing equipment available for periodic inspection by the Director or the Director’s designee, and shall have all testing equipment calibrated annually by the manufacturer or a qualified testing service in accordance with American National Standards Institute specifications.

The Director shall adopt rules implementing the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d).

§ 3283.
Prices to be disclosed.

A licensee shall disclose in a clear and conspicuous manner the range of retail prices charged for goods and services. The disclosure schedule shall be posted in each licensee’s office and retail establishment in which the licensee works, and a written copy given to each client, patient, or customer prior to any sale. Disclosures shall be in the manner set forth by the Director by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3283a.
Expired. 2001, No. 151 (Adj. Sess.), § 32a, eff. July 1, 2003.

§ 3284.
Terms of sale; 45-day trial period.

Any sales contract for equipment, including a hearing aid, sold by a licensee to a person in this State, shall contain a clause that requires the licensee to refund the full product price of the equipment, except for the cost of earmolds and service, up to 45 days from the date of delivery of any new or substantially refabricated equipment if, in the opinion of the consumer, the equipment is not satisfactory.
(a) (1) Any sales contract for equipment, including a hearing aid, sold by a licensee to a person in this State, shall contain a clause that requires the licensee to refund the full product price of the equipment, except for the cost of earmolds and service, up to 45 days from the date of delivery of any new or substantially refabricated equipment if, in the opinion of the consumer, the equipment is not satisfactory.

If the returned equipment is damaged while in the possession of the consumer, the amount refunded shall be reduced by the reasonable amount of the damage.

The equipment shall not be sold thereafter as new.

As used in this subsection, “cost of service” means the actual cost of the service provided to fit a hearing aid or install or prepare the equipment, but shall not exceed five percent of the sale price or $50.00, whichever is greater.

The complete terms of the sale, including the terms of the 45-day trial period, the individual prices for goods and services sold, and such other information as the Director may require shall be disclosed in writing to the consumer before the sale is completed.

If the equipment is in the possession of the licensee, manufacturer, repairperson, or their agents during the trial period, the period of time the equipment is in such possession shall not be included in the calculation of the 45-day trial period.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 60

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(d);

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3285.
Prohibitions; penalties.

A person shall not:

practice or attempt to practice audiology or dispense hearing aids or hold oneself out as being permitted to do so in this State unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter;

use in connection with the person’s name an insignia or any letters or words that indicate the person is an audiologist or a hearing aid dispenser unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter; or

practice audiology or dispense hearing aids after the person’s license under this chapter has been suspended or revoked.

A person who violates a provision of this section or who obtains a license by fraud or misrepresentation shall be subject to the pertinent penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.

§ 3286.
Exemptions.

The provisions of section 3285 of this chapter shall not apply to a person enrolled in a course of study leading to a degree or certificate in audiology at a school accredited by the American Speech-Language Hearing Association, provided:

the activities and services performed constitute part of a supervised course of study;

the person is designated by a title that clearly indicates the person’s student or trainee status; and

the person is under the direct supervision of an audiologist licensed in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2015.